New Jersey, session 221, A4178.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of the Treasury, on behalf of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, is authorized to grant a temporary deed of easement of 0.5175± acres of land, located at Block 106, Lot 1 of the tax map of the Borough of Sea Girt, Monmouth County, also known as the Sea Girt National Training Center.  This temporary deed of easement shall be for a term of 30 years granted to Confluence Networks LLC, for the use of an existing underground telecom infrastructure for the installation of a new submarine cable system, for a one-time fee of $1,120,230 based on the appraised value. b.    The granting of this temporary deed of easement authorized by subsection a. of this section shall be executed in accordance with the terms and condition approved by the State House Commission. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.